Utah statutes.
78B-15-405.   Furnishing of information -- Confidentiality.
(1)  The Office of Vital Records shall send a copy of the filing to a person
or entity set forth in Subsection (2), who has requested a copy.  The copy of
the filing shall be sent to the most recent address provided by the requestor.
(2)  Information contained in records which are filed pursuant to Section
78B-15-401 is confidential and may be released on request only to:
(a)  a tribunal or a person designated by the tribunal;
(b)  the mother of the child who is the subject of the filing;
(c)  an agency authorized by other law to receive the information;
(d)  a licensed child-placing agency;
(e)  the Office of Recovery Services, the Office of the Attorney General, or a
support-enforcement agency of another state or tribe;
(f)  a party or the party's attorney of record in a proceeding under this
chapter or in a proceeding for adoption of, or for termination of parental
rights regarding, a child who is the subject of the filing; and
(g)  the registry of paternity in another state.
